Illinois, session 104th, HB4524.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Section 5-46005 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-46005)7    (This Section may contain text from a Public Act with a 8delayed effective date)9    Sec. 5-46005. Definitions. As used in this Division:10    "Low-voltage solar-powered device" means a piece of 11equipment designed for a particular purpose, including, but 12not limited to, doorbells, security systems, and illumination 13equipment, powered by a solar collector operating at less than 1450 volts, and located:15        (1) entirely within the lot or parcel owned by the 16    property owner; or17        (2) within a common area without being permanently 18    attached to common property.19    "Plug-in solar energy system" has the meaning given to 20that term in Section 16-507.5a of the Public Utilities Act. 21    "Solar collector" means:22        (1) an assembly, structure, or design, including 23    passive elements, used for gathering, concentrating, or   HB4524- 2 -LRB104 17587 AAS 31015 b1    absorbing direct and indirect solar energy and specially 2    designed for holding a substantial amount of useful 3    thermal energy and to transfer that energy to a gas, 4    solid, or liquid or to use that energy directly;5        (2) a mechanism that absorbs solar energy and converts 6    it into electricity;7        (3) a mechanism or process used for gathering solar 8    energy through wind or thermal gradients; or9        (4) a component used to transfer thermal energy to a 10    gas, solid, or liquid, or to convert it into electricity.11    "Solar energy" means radiant energy received from the sun 12at wavelengths suitable for heat transfer, photosynthetic use, 13or photovoltaic use.14    "Solar energy system" means:15        (1) a complete assembly, structure, or design of a 16    solar collector or a solar storage mechanism that uses 17    solar energy for generating electricity or for heating or 18    cooling gases, solids, liquids, or other materials; and19        (2) the design, materials, or elements of a system and 20    its maintenance, operation, and labor components, and the 21    necessary components, if any, of supplemental conventional 22    energy systems designed or constructed to interface with a 23    solar energy system.24    "Solar energy system" includes a plug-in solar energy 25system.26    "Solar storage mechanism" means equipment or elements,   HB4524- 3 -LRB104 17587 AAS 31015 b1such as piping and transfer mechanisms, containers, heat 2exchangers, batteries, or controls thereof and gases, solids, 3liquids, or combinations thereof, that are utilized for 4storing solar energy, gathered by a solar collector, for 5subsequent use.6(Source: P.A. 104-458, eff. 6-1-26.) 7    Section 10. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 8changing Section 11-15.5-5 as follows: 9    (65 ILCS 5/11-15.5-5)10    (This Section may contain text from a Public Act with a 11delayed effective date)12    Sec. 11-15.5-5. Definitions. As used in this Division:13    "Low-voltage solar-powered device" means a piece of 14equipment designed for a particular purpose, including, but 15not limited to, doorbells, security systems, and illumination 16equipment, powered by a solar collector operating at less than 1750 volts, and located:18        (1) entirely within the lot or parcel owned by the 19    property owner; or20        (2) within a common area without being permanently 21    attached to common property.22    "Plug-in solar energy system" has the meaning given to 23that term in Section 16-507.5a of the Public Utilities Act. 24    "Solar collector" means:  HB4524- 4 -LRB104 17587 AAS 31015 b1        (1) an assembly, structure, or design, including 2    passive elements, used for gathering, concentrating, or 3    absorbing direct and indirect solar energy and specially 4    designed for holding a substantial amount of useful 5    thermal energy and to transfer that energy to a gas, 6    solid, or liquid or to use that energy directly;7        (2) a mechanism that absorbs solar energy and converts 8    it into electricity;9        (3) a mechanism or process used for gathering solar 10    energy through wind or thermal gradients; or11        (4) a component used to transfer thermal energy to a 12    gas, solid, or liquid, or to convert it into electricity.13    "Solar energy" means radiant energy received from the sun 14at wavelengths suitable for heat transfer, photosynthetic use, 15or photovoltaic use.16    "Solar energy system" means:17        (1) a complete assembly, structure, or design of a 18    solar collector or a solar storage mechanism that uses 19    solar energy for generating electricity or for heating or 20    cooling gases, solids, liquids, or other materials; and21        (2) the design, materials, or elements of a system and 22    its maintenance, operation, and labor components, and the 23    necessary components, if any, of supplemental conventional 24    energy systems designed or constructed to interface with a 25    solar energy system.26    "Solar energy system" includes a plug-in solar energy   HB4524- 5 -LRB104 17587 AAS 31015 b1system. 2    "Solar storage mechanism" means equipment or elements, 3such as piping and transfer mechanisms, containers, heat 4exchangers, batteries, or controls thereof and gases, solids, 5liquids, or combinations thereof, that are utilized for 6storing solar energy, gathered by a solar collector, for 7subsequent use.8(Source: P.A. 104-458, eff. 6-1-26.) 9    Section 15. The Public Utilities Act is amended by adding 10Section 16-507.5a as follows: 11    (220 ILCS 5/16-507.5a new)12    Sec. 16-507.5a. Plug-in solar energy system.13    (a) As used in this Section:14    "Electricity provider" has the meaning given to that term 15in Section 16-107.5.16    "Eligible customer" means a retail customer of an 17electricity provider.18    "Net electricity metering" has the meaning given to that 19term in Section 16-107.5.20    "Plug-in solar energy system" means a moveable 21photovoltaic generation device that:22        (1) may or may not include an energy storage system;23        (2) exports no more than 1,200 watts to an outlet;24        (3) is designed to be connected to a building's   HB4524- 6 -LRB104 17587 AAS 31015 b1    electrical system through a standard outlet;2        (4) is intended primarily to offset part of an 3    eligible customer's electricity consumption; and4        (5) is certified by Underwriters Laboratories or an 5    equivalent nationally recognized testing laboratory.6    (b) An electricity provider shall not require an eligible 7customer who uses, or intends to install and use, a plug-in 8solar energy system to do any of the following:9        (1) obtain the electricity provider's approval before 10    installing or using the plug-in solar energy system;11        (2) pay a fee or charge related to the installation or 12    use of the plug-in solar energy system; or13        (3) install additional controls or equipment beyond 14    what is integrated into the plug-in solar energy system.15    (c) A plug-in solar energy system is exempt from 16interconnection requirements under Section 16-107.5 and any 17rules adopted by the Commission pursuant to Section 16-107.5.18    (d) A plug-in solar energy system is not eligible for net 19electricity metering under Section 16-107.5 or any rebate 20under Section 16-107.6.21    (e) An electricity provider is not liable for any damage 22or injury caused by an eligible customer's plug-in solar 23energy system.24    (f) A plug-in solar energy system that has a maximum power 25output to a receptacle outlet of 391 watts or less is exempt 26from any building safety code provisions or any product   HB4524- 7 -LRB104 17587 AAS 31015 b1listing standard provisions that would require alterations to 2a building's premises, wiring, or electrical panels. 3Landlords, homeowners' associations, common interest community 4associations, and condominium unit owners' associations shall 5not adopt, enforce, or attempt to enforce any restriction, 6covenant, bylaw, regulation, lease stipulation, or other rule 7that directly or indirectly restricts, prohibits, or imposes 8unreasonable conditions on the installation, use, or operation 9of a plug-in solar energy system subject to this subsection 10(f). Any such restriction, covenant, bylaw, regulation, lease 11stipulation, or other rule is void and unenforceable as a 12matter of public policy. Landlords, homeowners' associations, 13common interest community associations, and condominium unit 14owners' associations may not impose fees, insurance 15requirements, or procedural conditions that function as a 16prohibition on the installation, use, or operation of a 17plug-in solar energy system subject to this subsection (f). 18This subsection (f) applies only to leases, contracts, 19covenants, bylaws, rules, or other governing documents 20created, entered into, renewed, or amended on or after the 21effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 22Assembly. 23    Section 20. The Homeowners' Energy Policy Statement Act is 24amended by changing Section 10 as follows:   HB4524- 8 -LRB104 17587 AAS 31015 b1    (765 ILCS 165/10)2    Sec. 10. Definitions. In this Act:3    "Plug-in solar energy system" has the meaning given to 4that term in Section 16-507.5a of the Public Utilities Act. 5    "Solar energy" means radiant energy received from the sun 6at wave lengths suitable for heat transfer, photosynthetic 7use, or photovoltaic use.8    "Solar collector" means:9        (1) an assembly, structure, or design, including 10    passive elements, used for gathering, concentrating, or 11    absorbing direct and indirect solar energy, specially 12    designed for holding a substantial amount of useful 13    thermal energy and to transfer that energy to a gas, 14    solid, or liquid or to use that energy directly; or15        (2) a mechanism that absorbs solar energy and converts 16    it into electricity; or17        (3) a mechanism or process used for gathering solar 18    energy through wind or thermal gradients; or19        (4) a component used to transfer thermal energy to a 20    gas, solid, or liquid, or to convert it into electricity.21    "Solar storage mechanism" means equipment or elements 22(such as piping and transfer mechanisms, containers, heat 23exchangers, batteries, or controls thereof, and gases, solids, 24liquids, or combinations thereof) that are utilized for 25storing solar energy, gathered by a solar collector, for 26subsequent use.  HB4524- 9 -LRB104 17587 AAS 31015 b1    "Solar energy system" means:2        (1) a complete assembly, structure, or design of solar 3    collector, or a solar storage mechanism, which uses solar 4    energy for generating electricity or for heating or 5    cooling gases, solids, liquids, or other materials; and6        (2) the design, materials, or elements of a system and 7    its maintenance, operation, and labor components, and the 8    necessary components, if any, of supplemental conventional 9    energy systems designed or constructed to interface with a 10    solar energy system. 11    "Solar energy system" includes a plug-in solar energy 12system. 13(Source: P.A. 102-161, eff. 7-26-21.)